Utah statutes.
39-6-52.   Finding or sentence -- Error -- Review.

(1)  A finding or sentence of a military court may not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

(2)  A reviewing authority with the power to approve or affirm a finding of guilty may approve or affirm that portion of the finding that includes a lesser included offense.

